District of Columbia statutes.
29-1108

Liability.

(a)

A debt, obligation, or other liability of an unincorporated nonprofit association, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise shall:

(1)

Be solely the debt, obligation, or other liability of the association; and

(2)

Not become the debt, obligation, or other liability of a member or manager solely by reason of the member acting as a member or the manager acting as a manager.

(b)

A person’s status as a member or manager of shall not prevent or restrict law other than this chapter from imposing liability on the person or the association because of the person’s conduct.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 8 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).